Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-1301 to 48-1306 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Registered Apprenticeship Act.

Laws 2026, LB847, § 1.
July 18, 2026